Connecticut, session 2026, HB05433.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47-245 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Except as provided in the declaration, the bylaws, subsection (b)
of this section, or other provisions of this chapter, the executive board
may act in all instances on behalf of the association. In the performance
of their duties, officers and members of the executive board appointed
by the declarant shall exercise the degree of care and loyalty to the
association required of a trustee and officers and members of the
executive board not appointed by a declarant shall exercise the degree
of care and loyalty to the association required of an officer or director of
a corporation organized under chapter 602, and are subject to the
conflict of interest rules governing directors and officers under chapter
602. The standards of care and loyalty described in this section apply
regardless of the form in which the association is organized.
LCO No. 2373 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5433
(b) The executive board may not:
(1) Amend the declaration, except as provided in section 47-236;
(2) Terminate the common interest community;
(3) Elect members of the executive board, except that the executive
board may fill vacancies in its membership for the unexpired portion of
any term or, if earlier, until the next regularly scheduled election of
executive board members; or
(4) Determine the qualifications, powers and duties, or terms of office
of executive board members.
(c) The executive board shall adopt budgets as provided in section
47-261e.
(d) Subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, the
declaration may provide for a period of declarant control of the
association, during which a declarant, or persons designated by the
declarant, may appoint and remove the officers and members of the
executive board. A declarant may voluntarily surrender the right to
appoint and remove officers and members of the executive board before
the period ends. In that event, the declarant may require, during the
remainder of the period, that specified actions of the association or
executive board, as described in a recorded instrument executed by the
declarant, be approved by the declarant before they become effective.
Regardless of the period provided in the declaration, a period of
declarant control terminates no later than the earlier of: (1) Sixty days
after conveyance of sixty per cent of the units that may be created to unit
owners other than a declarant, except that in the case of a master
planned community, control terminates no later than sixty days after
conveyance to unit owners other than the declarant of sixty per cent of
the maximum number of units that may be built, if that number is
specified, or, if no such number is specified, after conveyance to unit
owners other than the declarant of three hundred units; (2) two years
LCO No. 2373 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5433
after all declarants have ceased to offer units for sale in the ordinary
course of business; (3) two years after any right to add new units was
last exercised; or (4) the date the declarant, after giving notice in a record
to unit owners, records an instrument voluntarily surrendering all
rights to control activities of the association.
(e) Not later than sixty days after conveyance of one-third of the units
that may be created to unit owners other than a declarant, at least one
member and not less than one-third of the members of the executive
board shall be elected by unit owners other than the declarant.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) of section 47-239,
not later than the termination of any period of declarant control, the unit
owners shall elect an executive board of at least three members, at least
a majority of whom shall be unit owners. Unless the declaration or
bylaws provides for the election of officers by the unit owners, the
executive board shall elect the officers. The executive board members
and officers shall take office upon election.
(g) A declaration may provide for the appointment of specified
positions on the executive board by either a governmental subdivision
or agency or a nonstock corporation exempt from taxation under 26 USC
501(c)(3) and 26 USC 4940(d)(2), as from time to time amended, during
or after the period of declarant control. A declaration may also provide
a method for filling vacancies in those specified positions, other than by
election by the unit owners, except that, after the period of declarant
control, appointed members (1) may not comprise more than one-third
of the board, and (2) have no greater authority than any other member
of the board.
(h) Within thirty days after unit owners other than the declarant elect
a majority of the members of the executive board, the declarant shall
deliver to the association all property of the unit owners and of the
association held by or controlled by the declarant, including without
limitation the following items: (1) The original or a certified copy of the
LCO No. 2373 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5433
recorded declaration as amended; the association articles of
incorporation, if the association is incorporated; bylaws; minute books
and other books and records of the association; and any rules and
regulations which may have been promulgated; (2) an accounting for
association funds and financial statements, from the date the association
received funds and ending on the date the period of declarant control
ends. The financial statements shall be audited by an independent
certified public accountant and shall be accompanied by the
accountant's letter, expressing either (A) the opinion that the financial
statements present fairly the financial position of the association in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles or (B) a
disclaimer of the accountant's ability to attest to the fairness of the
presentation of the financial information in conformity with generally
accepted accounting principles, and the reasons therefor. The expense
of the audit shall not be paid for or charged to the association; (3)
association funds or control thereof; (4) all of declarant's tangible
personal property that has been represented by the declarant to be the
property of the association or, unless the declarant has disclosed in the
public offering statement that all such personal property used in the
common interest community will remain the declarant's property, all of
the declarant's tangible personal property that is necessary for, and has
been used exclusively in, the operation and enjoyment of the common
elements, and inventories of these properties; (5) a copy of any plans
and specifications used in the construction of the improvements in the
100 common interest community which were completed within two years
101 before the declaration was recorded; (6) all insurance policies then in
102 force, in which the unit owners, the association or its directors and
103 officers are named as insured persons; (7) copies of any certificates of
104 occupancy that may have been issued with respect to any improvements
105 comprising the common interest community; (8) any other permits
106 issued by governmental bodies applicable to the common interest
107 community and which are currently in force or which were issued
108 within one year prior to the date on which unit owners other than the
109 declarant took control of the association; (9) written warranties of the
LCO No. 2373 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5433
110 contractor, subcontractors, suppliers and manufacturers that are still
111 effective; (10) a roster of unit owners and mortgagees and their
112 addresses and telephone numbers, if known, as shown on the
113 declarant's records; (11) employment contracts in which the association
114 is a contracting party; and (12) any service contract in which the
115 association is a contracting party or in which the association or the unit
116 owners have any obligation to pay a fee to the persons performing the
117 services.
118 (i) During the period of declarant control, the declarant shall, at least
119 every six months, provide the unit owners with a current financial
120 statement of the association. The statement shall be on a cash basis and
121 need not be audited by an independent accountant. It shall include,
122 without limitation, (1) all income and expenses for the calendar year to
123 date; (2) all accounts payable and receivable, including the ages of those
124 accounts and showing all sums due to and from the declarant and
125 affiliates of the declarant; (3) the amount of any funded replacement
126 reserves; and (4) the balance of any other funds of the association.
127 (j) No person shall provide or offer to any executive board member
128 or a person seeking election as an executive board member, and no
129 executive board member or person seeking election as an executive
130 board member shall accept, any item of value based on any
131 understanding that the vote, official action or judgment of such member
132 or person seeking election would be or has been influenced thereby. No
133 person providing contracting services on behalf of the association may
134 directly or indirectly provide any item of value in excess of fifty dollars
135 per calendar year to an executive board member of the association. No
136 person serving as an executive board member of the association may
137 accept any item or combination of items valued in excess of fifty dollars
138 in the aggregate per calendar year.
139 (k) No managing agent of an association, [or] person providing
140 association management services to such association or person
141 providing contracting services on behalf of such association shall
LCO No. 2373 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5433
142 campaign for any person seeking election as an executive board
143 member.
144 (l) In the performance of their duties related to the conduct of any
145 election held by the association, officers, members of the executive
146 board and any person providing contracting services on behalf of the
147 association shall exercise the same degree of care and loyalty to the
148 association and the unit owners of the association when conducting
149 such election as that required of a trustee of a governmental body or
150 municipal official who is responsible for the conduct of a state or
151 municipal election.
152 (m) The Office of State Ethics and the State Elections Enforcement
153 Commission may adopt regulations in accordance with the provisions
154 of chapter 54 to carry out the purposes of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47-245